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DTC P07 10/38TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensor
Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0710/38

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(2−tripdetection logic)
(a)Temperaturesensor resistance is less than79 �

(b)After theenginehasbeenoperating for15minutesor
more, the resistanceat the temp.sensor ismore than156k �

SOpenorshort inATF temperaturesensor
SATFtemperaturesensor
SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ATF temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ATF temperature sensor connector.
(b) Remove the ATF temperature sensor

(See page AT−8) .
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of ATF temperature
sensor at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F) and 120 ˚ C (248 ˚ F).
OK:

Resistance (Approx.):
20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F): 12.1 k�
120 ˚ C (248 ˚F):  616 �

NG Replace the ATF temperature sensor.

OK

2 Check harness and connector between ATF temperature sensor and Engine and
ECT ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).


